Arkansas, session 2025, SB476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 4, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-4-108. Leave for organ donation.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Living organ donor" means an individual who has donated all
or part of an organ and is not deceased;
(2) "Organ" means a human organ that is capable of being
transferred from the body of one (1) person to the body of another person;
(3) "State agency" means a department, agency, bureau, board, or
commission of any branch of state government; and
(4)(A) "State employee" means a full-time employee of a state
agency who has been employed with the state agency for at least twelve (12)
months.
*ANS240*
03/17/2025 1:35:24 PM ANS240

SB476
(B) "State employee" does not include:
(i) A member of the General Assembly;
(ii) An employee of the Secretary of State; or
(iii) An employee of the Treasurer of State.
(b)(1) A state employee shall be granted absence from work for a
period of time equal to twelve (12) weeks for recovery from surgery related
to a living organ donation.
(2) If the state employee learns of his or her surgery date to
be a living organ donor less than thirty (30) days in advance, then the state
employee shall give notice to the state agency as soon as reasonably
possible.
(3) For the purpose of calculating career service anniversary
dates, an absence under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is considered
full-time employment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 81, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-81-138. Application for life insurance — Discrimination based on
organ donor status prohibited — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Life insurer" means an entity that enters into a
contract that incorporates mortality risk, including an annuity contract.
(B) "Life insurer" includes without limitation an insurer
issuing life insurance contracts that grant additional benefits in the event
of an insured's disability; and
(2) "Living organ donor" means an individual who has donated all
or part of an organ and is not deceased.
(b) A life insurer authorized to transact the business of insurance in
this state shall not cancel, limit, or deny life insurance coverage or
establish any differential in premium rates based on an individual's status
as a living organ donor.
(c) A life insurer shall not consider an individual's decision to be a
living organ donor for any insurance purpose.



03/17/2025 1:35:24 PM ANS240